Nebraska, session 109, LB511.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-2-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 25-21,302, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
25-21,302 (1)(a) In addition to any other civil or criminal
penalties provided by law, any property used in the commission of a
violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act or section 28-813,
28-831, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 or
section 6, 7, or 8 of this act may be forfeited through a proceeding as
provided in this section.
(b) The following property shall be subject to forfeiture if used or
intended for use as an instrumentality in or used in furtherance of a
violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act or section 28-813,
28-831, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 or
section 6, 7, or 8 of this act:
(i) Conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels;
(ii) Books, records, telecommunication equipment, or computers;
(iii) Money or weapons;
(iv) Everything of value furnished, or intended to be furnished, in
exchange for an act in violation and all proceeds traceable to the
exchange;
(v) Negotiable instruments and securities;
(vi) Any property, real or personal, directly or indirectly acquired
or received in a violation or as an inducement to violate;
(vii) Any property traceable to proceeds from a violation; and
(viii) Any real property, including any right, title, and interest
in the whole of or any part of any lot or tract of land, used in
furtherance of a violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act or
section 28-813, 28-831, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01,
or 28-1107 or section 6, 7, or 8 of this act.
(c)(i) No property used by any person as a common carrier in the
transaction of business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture
under this section unless it appears that the owner or other person in
-3-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
charge of the property is a consenting party or privy to a violation of
the Child Pornography Prevention Act or section 28-813, 28-831, 28-1102,
28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 or section 6, 7, or 8
of this act.
(ii) No property is subject to forfeiture under this section by
reason of any act or omission proved by the owner thereof to have been
committed or omitted without his or her actual knowledge or consent. If
the confiscating authority has reason to believe that the property is
leased or rented property, then the confiscating authority shall notify
the owner of the property within five days after the confiscation or
within five days after forming reason to believe that the property is
leased or rented property.
(iii) Forfeiture of property encumbered by a bona fide security
interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if such party
neither had actual knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission.
(2) No property shall be forfeited under this section, to the extent
of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act or omission established
by the owner to have been committed or omitted without his or her actual
knowledge or consent.
(3) Seizure without process may be made if the seizure is incident
to an arrest or a search under a search warrant.
(4)(a) When any property is seized under this section, proceedings
shall be instituted within a reasonable period of time from the date of
seizure or the subject property shall be immediately returned to the
party from whom seized.
(b) A petition for forfeiture shall be filed by the Attorney General
or a county attorney in the name of the State of Nebraska and may be
filed in the county in which the seizure is made, the county in which the
criminal prosecution is brought, or the county in which the owner of the
seized property is found. Forfeiture proceedings may be brought in the
district court or the county court. A copy of the petition shall be
-4-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
served upon the following persons by service of process in the same
manner as in civil cases:
(i) The owner of the property if the owner's address is known;
(ii) Any secured party who has registered a lien or filed a
financing statement as provided by law if the identity of the secured
party can be ascertained by the entity filing the petition by making a
good faith effort to ascertain the identity of the secured party;
(iii) Any other bona fide lienholder or secured party or other
person holding an interest in the property in the nature of a security
interest of whom the seizing law enforcement agency has actual knowledge;
and
(iv) Any person in possession of property subject to forfeiture at
the time that it was seized.
(5) If the property is a motor vehicle subject to titling under the
Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act or a vessel subject to titling
under the State Boat Act, and if there is any reasonable cause to believe
that the motor vehicle or vessel has been titled, inquiry of the
Department of Motor Vehicles shall be made as to what the records of the
department show as to who is the record owner of the motor vehicle or
vessel and who, if anyone, holds any lien or security interest that
affects the motor vehicle or vessel.
(6) If the property is a motor vehicle or vessel and is not titled
in the State of Nebraska, then an attempt shall be made to ascertain the
name and address of the person in whose name the motor vehicle or vessel
is licensed, and if the motor vehicle or vessel is licensed in a state
which has in effect a certificate of title law, inquiry of the
appropriate agency of that state shall be made as to what the records of
the agency show as to who is the record owner of the motor vehicle or
vessel and who, if anyone, holds any lien, security interest, or other
instrument in the nature of a security device that affects the motor
vehicle or vessel.
-5-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
(7) If the property is of a nature that a financing statement is
required by the laws of this state to be filed to perfect a security
interest affecting the property and if there is any reasonable cause to
believe that a financing statement covering the security interest has
been filed under the laws of this state, inquiry shall be made as to what
the records show as to who is the record owner of the property and who,
if anyone, has filed a financing statement affecting the property.
(8) If the property is an aircraft or part thereof and if there is
any reasonable cause to believe that an instrument in the nature of a
security device affects the property, inquiry shall be made as to what
the records of the Federal Aviation Administration show as to who is the
record owner of the property and who, if anyone, holds an instrument in
the nature of a security device which affects the property.
(9) If the answer to an inquiry states that the record owner of the
property is any person other than the person who was in possession of it
when it was seized or states that any person holds any lien, encumbrance,
security interest, other interest in the nature of a security interest,
mortgage, or deed of trust that affects the property, the record owner
and also any lienholder, secured party, other person who holds an
interest in the property in the nature of a security interest, or holder
of an encumbrance, mortgage, or deed of trust that affects the property
is to be named in the petition of forfeiture and is to be served with
process in the same manner as in civil cases.
(10) If the owner of the property cannot be found and served with a
copy of the petition of forfeiture or if no person was in possession of
the property subject to forfeiture at the time that it was seized and the
owner of the property is unknown, there shall be filed with the clerk of
the court in which the proceeding is pending an affidavit to such effect,
whereupon the clerk of the court shall publish notice of the hearing
addressed to "the Unknown Owner of ............," filling in the blank
space with a reasonably detailed description of the property subject to
-6-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
forfeiture. Service by publication shall be completed in the same manner
as is provided in the code of civil procedure for the service of process
in civil actions in the district courts of this state.
(11) No proceedings instituted pursuant to this section shall
proceed to hearing unless the judge conducting the hearing is satisfied
that this section has been complied with. Any answer received from an
inquiry required by this section shall be introduced into evidence at the
hearing.
(12)(a) An owner of property that has been seized shall file an
answer within thirty days after the completion of service of process. If
an answer is not filed, the court shall hear evidence that the property
is subject to forfeiture and forfeit the property to the seizing law
enforcement agency. If an answer is filed, a time for hearing on
forfeiture shall be set within thirty days after filing the answer or at
the succeeding term of court if court would not be in session within
thirty days after filing the answer. The court may postpone the
forfeiture hearing to a date past the time any criminal action is pending
against the owner upon request of any party.
(b) If the owner of the property has filed an answer denying that
the property is subject to forfeiture, then the burden is on the
petitioner to prove that the property is subject to forfeiture. However,
if an answer has not been filed by the owner of the property, the
petition for forfeiture may be introduced into evidence and is prima
facie evidence that the property is subject to forfeiture. The burden of
proof placed upon the petitioner in regard to property forfeited under
this section shall be by clear and convincing evidence.
(c) At the hearing any claimant of any right, title, or interest in
the property may prove his or her lien, encumbrance, security interest,
other interest in the nature of a security interest, mortgage, or deed of
trust to be bona fide and created without actual knowledge or consent
that the property was to be used so as to cause the property to be
-7-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
subject to forfeiture.
(d) If it is found that the property is subject to forfeiture, then
the judge shall forfeit the property. However, if proof at the hearing
discloses that the interest of any bona fide lienholder, any secured
party, any other person holding an interest in the property in the nature
of a security interest, or any holder of a bona fide encumbrance,
mortgage, or deed of trust is greater than or equal to the present value
of the property, the court shall order the property released to him or
her. If the interest is less than the present value of the property and
if the proof shows that the property is subject to forfeiture, the court
shall order the property forfeited.
(13) Unless otherwise provided in this section, all personal
property which is forfeited under this section shall be liquidated and,
after deduction of court costs and the expense of liquidation, the
proceeds shall be remitted to the county treasurer of the county in which
the seizure was made. The county treasurer shall remit all such proceeds
from property forfeited pursuant to this section to the State Treasurer
for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the
Constitution of Nebraska.
(14) All money forfeited under this section shall be remitted in the
same manner as provided in subsection (13) of this section.
(15) All real estate forfeited under this section shall be sold to
the highest bidder at a public auction for cash, the auction to be
conducted by the county sheriff or his or her designee at such place, on
such notice, and in accordance with the same procedure, as far as
practicable, as is required in the case of sales of land under execution
at law. The proceeds of the sale shall first be applied to the cost and
expense in administering and conducting the sale, then to the
satisfaction of all mortgages, deeds of trust, liens, and encumbrances of
record on the property. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted in the
same manner as provided in subsection (13) of this section.
-8-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
(16) The forfeiture procedure set forth in this section is the sole
remedy of any claimant, and no court shall have jurisdiction to interfere
therewith by replevin, by injunction, by supersedeas, or by any other
manner.
Sec. 2. Section 28-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-101 Sections 28-101 to 28-1357, 28-1601 to 28-1603, and 28-1701
and sections 6 to 9 of this act shall be known and may be cited as the
Nebraska Criminal Code.
Sec. 3. Section 28-801.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-801.01 (1) A Any person commits the offense of commercial sexual
exploitation if the who solicits another person pays, or offers or agrees
to pay, money or another thing of value to a person who is not his or her
spouse to perform any act of sexual contact or sexual penetration, as
those terms are defined in section 28-318 , in exchange for money or
other thing of value, commits solicitation of prostitution.
(2) Any person convicted of violating subsection (1) of this section
shall be punished as follows:
(a) For a first offense, if the person solicited was eighteen years
of age or older at the time of the offense, the violator shall:
(i) Be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor;
(ii) Subject to section 29-2206, be ordered to pay a fine of one
thousand dollars; and
(iii) Attend and complete the assessment and program required under
subsection (3) of this section; and
(b) For a first offense, if the person solicited was younger than
eighteen years of age at the time of the offense, or for any second or
subsequent offense regardless of the age of the person solicited, the
violator shall:
(i) Be guilty of a Class IV felony;
-9-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
(ii) Subject to section 29-2206, be ordered to pay a fine of five
thousand dollars; and
(iii) Be required to register under the Sex Offender Registration
Act.
(a) If such person has had no prior convictions, such person shall
be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor and pay a fine of not less than two
hundred fifty dollars, unless the person solicited is under the age of
eighteen years, in which case such person violating this section shall be
guilty of a Class IV felony. If the court places such person on
probation, such order of probation shall include in its conditions (i)
the payment of a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars, (ii)
that such person shall satisfactorily attend and complete an appropriate
mental health and substance abuse assessment conducted by a licensed
mental health professional or substance abuse professional authorized to
complete such assessment, and (iii) that such person shall satisfactorily
attend and complete, at his or her own expense, an educational program
designed to educate participants on the effect of prostitution on the
participants' health, on the person solicited, and on the community; and
(b) If such person has had one or more prior convictions, such
person shall be guilty of a Class IV felony and pay a fine of not less
than five hundred dollars. If the court places such person on probation,
such order of probation shall include in its conditions (i) the payment
of a fine of not less than five hundred dollars, (ii) that
(3)(a) For an offense described in subdivision (2)(a) of this
section, the court shall order the violator to such person shall
satisfactorily attend and complete:
(i) An an appropriate mental health and substance abuse assessment
conducted by a licensed mental health professional or substance abuse
professional authorized to complete such assessment; , and
(ii) At (iii) that such person shall satisfactorily attend and
complete, at his or her own expense, an educational program designed to
-10-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
educate participants on the negative effects effect of prostitution on
the participants' health, on the health of their families, on the person
solicited, and on the community.
(b) The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice
shall develop or approve programs that satisfy the requirements of
subdivision (3)(a)(ii) of this section. Such programs shall incorporate
evidence-based practices and best practices from other jurisdictions.
(4) (3) It is an affirmative defense to prosecution under this
section that such person was a trafficking victim as defined in section
28-830.
(5)(a) A person convicted of an offense described in subdivision (2)
(a) of this section who completes the sentence for such offense may file
a motion in the court of conviction to set aside the conviction.
(b) For purposes of this section, a sentence is successfully
completed if the offender has:
(i) Completed any sentence of imprisonment;
(ii) Paid the fine, unless such fine has been waived or discharged;
and
(iii) Successfully attended and completed the assessment and program
required by subdivision (3)(a) of this section.
(c) If the court determines that the person has successfully
completed such person's sentence and that such person has not been
convicted of any second or subsequent violation of this section, the
court shall grant the motion and issue an order setting aside the
conviction.
(d) An order setting aside a conviction or an adjudication under
this subsection shall have the same effect as an order setting aside a
conviction as provided in subsections (5) and (6) of section 29-2264.
Sec. 4. Section 28-830, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-830 For purposes of sections 28-830 and 28-831 and sections 6 to
-11-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
9 of this act, the following definitions apply:
(1) Actor means a person who solicits, procures, or supervises the
services or labor of another person;
(2) Commercial sexual activity means any sex act on account of which
anything of value is given, promised to, or received by any person;
(3) Debt bondage means inducing another person to provide:
(a) Commercial sexual activity in payment toward or satisfaction of
a real or purported debt; or
(b) Labor or services in payment toward or satisfaction of a real or
purported debt if:
(i) The reasonable value of the labor or services is not applied
toward the liquidation of the debt; or
(ii) The length of the labor or services is not limited and the
nature of the labor or services is not defined;
(4) Financial harm means theft by extortion as described by section
28-513;
(5) Forced labor or services means labor or services that are
performed or provided by another person and are obtained or maintained
through:
(a) Inflicting or threatening to inflict serious personal injury, as
defined by section 28-318, on another person;
(b) Physically restraining or threatening to physically restrain the
other person;
(c) Abusing or threatening to abuse the legal process against
another person to cause arrest or deportation for violation of federal
immigration law;
(d) Controlling or threatening to control another person's access to
a controlled substance listed in Schedule I, II or III of section 28-405;
(e) Exploiting another person's substantial functional impairment as
defined in section 28-368 or substantial mental impairment as defined in
section 28-369;
-12-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
(f) Knowingly destroying, concealing, removing, confiscating, or
possessing any actual or purported passport or other immigration document
or any other actual or purported government identification document of
the other person; or
(g) Causing or threatening to cause financial harm to another
person, including debt bondage;
(6) Labor or services means work or activity of economic or
financial value;
(7) Labor trafficking means knowingly recruiting, enticing,
harboring, transporting, providing, or obtaining by any means or
attempting to recruit, entice, harbor, transport, provide, or obtain by
any means a person eighteen years of age or older intending or knowing
that the person will be subjected to forced labor or services;
(8) Labor trafficking of a minor means knowingly recruiting,
enticing, harboring, transporting, providing, or obtaining by any means
or attempting to recruit, entice, harbor, transport, provide, or obtain
by any means a minor intending or knowing that the minor will be
subjected to forced labor or services;
(9) Maintain means, in relation to labor or services, to secure
continued performance thereof, regardless of any initial agreement by the
other person to perform such type of service;
(10) Minor means a person younger than eighteen years of age;
(11) Sex trafficking means knowingly recruiting, enticing,
harboring, transporting, providing, soliciting, or obtaining by any means
or knowingly attempting to recruit, entice, harbor, transport, provide,
solicit, or obtain by any means a person eighteen years of age or older
for the purpose of having such person engage without consent, as defined
in section 28-318, in commercial sexual activity, sexually explicit
performance, or the production of pornography or to cause or attempt to
cause a person eighteen years of age or older to engage without consent,
as defined in section 28-318, in commercial sexual activity, sexually
-13-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
explicit performance, or the production of pornography;
(12) Sex trafficking of a minor means knowingly recruiting,
enticing, harboring, transporting, providing, soliciting, or obtaining by
any means or knowingly attempting to recruit, entice, harbor, transport,
provide, solicit, or obtain by any means a minor for the purpose of
having such minor engage in commercial sexual activity, sexually explicit
performance, or the production of pornography or to cause or attempt to
cause a minor to engage in commercial sexual activity, sexually explicit
performance, or the production of pornography;
(13) Sexually explicit performance means a live or public play,
dance, show, or other exhibition intended to arouse or gratify sexual
desire or to appeal to prurient interests; and
(14) Trafficking victim means a person subjected to any act or acts
prohibited by section 28-831 or section 6 of this act.
Sec. 5. Section 28-831, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-831 (1) Any person who engages in labor trafficking of a minor or
sex trafficking of a minor is guilty of a Class IB felony.
(2) Any person who engages in labor trafficking or sex trafficking
is guilty of a Class II felony.
(3) Any person, other than a trafficking victim, who knowingly
benefits from or participates in a venture which has, as part of the
venture, an act that is in violation of this section is guilty of a Class
IIA felony.
(4) It is not a defense in a prosecution under this section (a) that
consent was given by the minor victim, (b) that the defendant believed
that the minor victim gave consent, or (c) that the defendant believed
that the minor victim was an adult.
Sec. 6. (1) Any person who engages in labor trafficking of a minor
is guilty of a Class IB felony.
(2) Any person who engages in labor trafficking is guilty of a Class
-14-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
II felony.
Sec. 7. Any person, other than a trafficking victim, who knowingly
benefits from or participates in a venture that has, as part of the
venture, an act that is in violation of section 28-831 is guilty of a
Class IIA felony.
Sec. 8. Any person, other than a trafficking victim, who knowingly
benefits from or participates in a venture that has, as part of the
venture, an act that is in violation of section 6 of this act is guilty
of a Class IIA felony.
Sec. 9. It is not a defense in a prosecution under section 28-831
or section 6, 7, or 8 of this act that:
(1) Consent was given by the minor victim;
(2) The defendant believed that the minor victim gave consent; or
(3) The defendant believed that the minor victim was an adult.
Sec. 10. Section 28-1354, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-1354 For purposes of the Public Protection Act:
(1) Enterprise means any individual, sole proprietorship,
partnership, corporation, trust, association, or any legal entity, union,
or group of individuals associated in fact although not a legal entity,
and shall include illicit as well as licit enterprises as well as other
entities;
(2) Pattern of racketeering activity means a cumulative loss for one
or more victims or gains for the enterprise of not less than one thousand
five hundred dollars resulting from at least two acts of racketeering
activity, one of which occurred after August 30, 2009, and the last of
which occurred within ten years, excluding any period of imprisonment,
after the commission of a prior act of racketeering activity;
(3) Person Until January 1, 2017, person means any individual or
entity, as defined in section 21-2014, holding or capable of holding a
legal, equitable, or beneficial interest in property. Beginning January
-15-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
1, 2017, person means any individual or entity, as defined in section
21-214, holding or capable of holding a legal, equitable, or beneficial
interest in property;
(4) Prosecutor includes the Attorney General of the State of
Nebraska, the deputy attorney general, assistant attorneys general, a
county attorney, a deputy county attorney, or any person so designated by
the Attorney General, a county attorney, or a court of the state to carry
out the powers conferred by the act;
(5) Racketeering activity includes the commission of, criminal
attempt to commit, conspiracy to commit, aiding and abetting in the
commission of, aiding in the consummation of, acting as an accessory to
the commission of, or the solicitation, coercion, or intimidation of
another to commit or aid in the commission of any of the following:
(a) Offenses against the person which include: Murder in the first
degree under section 28-303; murder in the second degree under section
28-304; manslaughter under section 28-305; assault in the first degree
under section 28-308; assault in the second degree under section 28-309;
assault in the third degree under section 28-310; terroristic threats
under section 28-311.01; kidnapping under section 28-313; false
imprisonment in the first degree under section 28-314; false imprisonment
in the second degree under section 28-315; sexual assault in the first
degree under section 28-319; and robbery under section 28-324;
(b) Offenses relating to controlled substances which include: To
unlawfully manufacture, distribute, deliver, dispense, or possess with
intent to manufacture, distribute, deliver, or dispense a controlled
substance under subsection (1) of section 28-416; possession of marijuana
weighing more than one pound under subsection (12) of section 28-416;
possession of money used or intended to be used to facilitate a violation
of subsection (1) of section 28-416 prohibited under subsection (17) of
section 28-416; any violation of section 28-418; to unlawfully
manufacture, distribute, deliver, or possess with intent to distribute or
-16-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
deliver an imitation controlled substance under section 28-445;
possession of anhydrous ammonia with the intent to manufacture
methamphetamine under section 28-451; and possession of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine with the intent to manufacture
methamphetamine under section 28-452;
(c) Offenses against property which include: Arson in the first
degree under section 28-502; arson in the second degree under section
28-503; arson in the third degree under section 28-504; burglary under
section 28-507; theft by unlawful taking or disposition under section
28-511; theft by shoplifting under section 28-511.01; theft by deception
under section 28-512; theft by extortion under section 28-513; theft of
services under section 28-515; theft by receiving stolen property under
section 28-517; criminal mischief under section 28-519; and unlawfully
depriving or obtaining property or services using a computer under
section 28-1344;
(d) Offenses involving fraud which include: Burning to defraud an
insurer under section 28-505; forgery in the first degree under section
28-602; forgery in the second degree under section 28-603; criminal
possession of a forged instrument under section 28-604; criminal
possession of written instrument forgery devices under section 28-605;
criminal impersonation under section 28-638; identity theft under section
28-639; identity fraud under section 28-640; false statement or book
entry under section 28-612; tampering with a publicly exhibited contest
under section 28-614; issuing a false financial statement for purposes of
obtaining a financial transaction device under section 28-619;
unauthorized use of a financial transaction device under section 28-620;
criminal possession of a financial transaction device under section
28-621; unlawful circulation of a financial transaction device in the
first degree under section 28-622; unlawful circulation of a financial
transaction device in the second degree under section 28-623; criminal
possession of a blank financial transaction device under section 28-624;
-17-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
criminal sale of a blank financial transaction device under section
28-625; criminal possession of a financial transaction forgery device
under section 28-626; unlawful manufacture of a financial transaction
device under section 28-627; laundering of sales forms under section
28-628; unlawful acquisition of sales form processing services under
section 28-629; unlawful factoring of a financial transaction device
under section 28-630; and fraudulent insurance acts under section 28-631;
(e) Offenses involving governmental operations which include: Abuse
of public records under section 28-911; perjury or subornation of perjury
under section 28-915; bribery under section 28-917; bribery of a witness
under section 28-918; tampering with a witness or informant or jury
tampering under section 28-919; bribery of a juror under section 28-920;
assault on an officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional
employee, a Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a health
care professional in the first degree under section 28-929; assault on an
officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a
Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a health care
professional in the second degree under section 28-930; assault on an
officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a
Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a health care
professional in the third degree under section 28-931; and assault on an
officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a
Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a health care
professional using a motor vehicle under section 28-931.01;
(f) Offenses involving gambling which include: Promoting gambling in
the first degree under section 28-1102; possession of gambling records
under section 28-1105; gambling debt collection under section 28-1105.01;
and possession of a gambling device under section 28-1107;
(g) Offenses relating to firearms, weapons, and explosives which
include: Carrying a concealed weapon under section 28-1202;
transportation or possession of machine guns, short rifles, or short
-18-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
shotguns under section 28-1203; unlawful possession of a handgun under
section 28-1204; unlawful transfer of a firearm to a juvenile under
section 28-1204.01; possession of a firearm by a prohibited juvenile
offender under section 28-1204.05; using a deadly weapon to commit a
felony, possession of a deadly weapon during the commission of a felony,
or carrying a firearm or destructive device during the commission of a
dangerous misdemeanor under section 28-1205; possession of a deadly
weapon by a prohibited person under section 28-1206; possession of a
defaced firearm under section 28-1207; defacing a firearm under section
28-1208; unlawful discharge of a firearm under section 28-1212.02;
possession, receipt, retention, or disposition of a stolen firearm under
section 28-1212.03; unlawful possession of explosive materials in the
first degree under section 28-1215; unlawful possession of explosive
materials in the second degree under section 28-1216; unlawful sale of
explosives under section 28-1217; use of explosives without a permit
under section 28-1218; obtaining an explosives permit through false
representations under section 28-1219; possession of a destructive device
under section 28-1220; threatening the use of explosives or placing a
false bomb under section 28-1221; using explosives to commit a felony
under section 28-1222; using explosives to damage or destroy property
under section 28-1223; and using explosives to kill or injure any person
under section 28-1224;
(h) Any violation of the Securities Act of Nebraska pursuant to
section 8-1117;
(i) Any violation of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 pursuant to
section 77-2713;
(j) Offenses relating to public health and morals which include:
Prostitution under section 28-801; pandering under section 28-802;
keeping a place of prostitution under section 28-804; labor trafficking,
sex trafficking , labor trafficking of a minor, or sex trafficking of a
minor under section 28-831; labor trafficking or labor trafficking of a
-19-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
minor under section 6 of this act; benefiting from or participating in a
sex trafficking venture under section 7 of this act; benefiting from or
participating in a labor trafficking venture under section 8 of this act;
a violation of section 28-1005; and any act relating to the visual
depiction of sexually explicit conduct prohibited in the Child
Pornography Prevention Act; and
(k) A violation of the Computer Crimes Act;
(6) State means the State of Nebraska or any political subdivision
or any department, agency, or instrumentality thereof; and
(7) Unlawful debt means a debt of at least one thousand five hundred
dollars:
(a) Incurred or contracted in gambling activity which was in
violation of federal law or the law of the state or which is
unenforceable under state or federal law in whole or in part as to
principal or interest because of the laws relating to usury; or
(b) Which was incurred in connection with the business of gambling
in violation of federal law or the law of the state or the business of
lending money or a thing of value at a rate usurious under state law if
the usurious rate is at least twice the enforceable rate.
Sec. 11. Section 29-110, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-110 (1) Except as otherwise provided by law, no person shall be
prosecuted for any felony unless the indictment is found by a grand jury
within three years next after the offense has been done or committed or
unless a complaint for the same is filed before the magistrate within
three years next after the offense has been done or committed and a
warrant for the arrest of the defendant has been issued.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, no person shall be
prosecuted, tried, or punished for any misdemeanor or other indictable
offense below the grade of felony or for any fine or forfeiture under any
penal statute unless the suit, information, or indictment for such
-20-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
offense is instituted or found within one year and six months from the
time of committing the offense or incurring the fine or forfeiture or
within one year for any offense the punishment of which is restricted by
a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars and to imprisonment not
exceeding three months.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by law, no person shall be
prosecuted for kidnapping under section 28-313, false imprisonment under
section 28-314 or 28-315, child abuse under section 28-707, pandering
under section 28-802, debauching a minor under section 28-805, or an
offense under section 28-813 when the victim is under sixteen years of
age at the time of the offense (a) unless the indictment for such offense
is found by a grand jury within seven years next after the offense has
been committed or within seven years next after the victim's sixteenth
birthday, whichever is later, or (b) unless a complaint for such offense
is filed before the magistrate within seven years next after the offense
has been committed or within seven years next after the victim's
sixteenth birthday, whichever is later, and a warrant for the arrest of
the defendant has been issued.
(4) Except as otherwise provided by law, no person shall be
prosecuted for a violation of subsection (2) or (3) of section 28-831,
subsection (2) of section 6 of this act, or section 7 or 8 of this act
(a) unless the indictment for such offense is found by a grand jury
within seven years next after the offense has been committed or within
seven years next after the victim's eighteenth birthday, whichever is
later, or (b) unless a complaint for such offense is filed before the
magistrate within seven years next after the offense has been committed
or within seven years next after the victim's eighteenth birthday,
whichever is later, and a warrant for the arrest of the defendant has
been issued.
(5) Except as otherwise provided by law, no person shall be
prosecuted for an offense under section 28-813.01 or 28-1463.05 (a)
-21-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
unless the indictment for such offense is found by a grand jury within
seven years next after the offense has been committed or within seven
years next after the victim's eighteenth birthday, whichever is later, or
(b) unless a complaint for such offense is filed before the magistrate
within seven years next after the offense has been committed or within
seven years next after the victim's eighteenth birthday, whichever is
later, and a warrant for the arrest of the defendant has been issued.
(6) No person shall be prosecuted for a violation of the Securities
Act of Nebraska under section 8-1117 unless the indictment for such
offense is found by a grand jury within five years next after the offense
has been done or committed or unless a complaint for such offense is
filed before the magistrate within five years next after the offense has
been done or committed and a warrant for the arrest of the defendant has
been issued.
(7) No person shall be prosecuted for criminal impersonation under
section 28-638, identity theft under section 28-639, or identity fraud
under section 28-640 unless the indictment for such offense is found by a
grand jury within five years next after the offense has been done or
committed or unless a complaint for such offense is filed before the
magistrate within five years next after the offense has been done or
committed and a warrant for the arrest of the defendant has been issued.
(8) No person shall be prosecuted for a violation of section 68-1017
if the aggregate value of all funds and other benefits obtained or
attempted to be obtained is five hundred dollars or more unless the
indictment for such offense is found by a grand jury within five years
next after the offense has been done or committed or unless a complaint
for such offense is filed before the magistrate within five years next
after the offense has been done or committed and a warrant for the arrest
of the defendant has been issued.
(9) No person shall be prosecuted for knowing and intentional abuse,
neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult or senior adult under
-22-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
section 28-386 unless the indictment for such offense is found by a grand
jury within six years next after the offense has been done or committed
or unless a complaint for such offense is filed before the magistrate
within six years next after the offense has been done or committed and a
warrant for the arrest of the defendant has been issued.
(10) Except as otherwise provided by law, no person shall be
prosecuted for an offense under section 28-717 (a) unless the indictment
for such offense is found by a grand jury within one year and six months
next after the offense has been committed or within one year and six
months next after the child reaches the age of majority, whichever is
later, or (b) unless a complaint for such offense is filed before the
magistrate within one year and six months next after the offense has been
committed or within one year and six months next after the child reaches
the age of majority, whichever is later, and a warrant for the arrest of
the defendant has been issued.
(11) There shall not be any time limitations for prosecution or
punishment for treason, murder, arson, forgery, sexual assault in the
first or second degree under section 28-319 or 28-320, sexual assault of
a child in the second or third degree under section 28-320.01, incest
under section 28-703, sexual assault of a child in the first degree under
section 28-319.01, labor trafficking of a minor or sex trafficking of a
minor under subsection (1) of section 28-831, labor trafficking of a
minor under subsection (1) of section 6 of this act, or an offense under
section 28-1463.03; nor shall there be any time limitations for
prosecution or punishment for sexual assault in the third degree under
section 28-320 when the victim is under sixteen years of age at the time
of the offense.
(12) The time limitations prescribed in this section shall include
all inchoate offenses pursuant to the Nebraska Criminal Code and
compounding a felony pursuant to section 28-301.
(13) The time limitations prescribed in this section shall not
-23-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
extend to any person fleeing from justice.
(14) When any suit, information, or indictment for any crime or
misdemeanor is limited by any statute to be brought or exhibited within
any other time than is limited by this section, then the suit,
information, or indictment shall be brought or exhibited within the time
limited by such statute.
(15) If any suit, information, or indictment is quashed or the
proceedings set aside or reversed on writ of error, the time during the
pendency of such suit, information, or indictment so quashed, set aside,
or reversed shall not be reckoned within this statute so as to bar any
new suit, information, or indictment for the same offense.
(16) The changes made to this section by Laws 2004, LB 943, shall
apply to offenses committed prior to April 16, 2004, for which the
statute of limitations has not expired as of such date and to offenses
committed on or after such date.
(17) The changes made to this section by Laws 2005, LB 713, shall
apply to offenses committed prior to September 4, 2005, for which the
statute of limitations has not expired as of such date and to offenses
committed on or after such date.
(18) The changes made to this section by Laws 2009, LB 97, and Laws
2006, LB 1199, shall apply to offenses committed prior to May 21, 2009,
for which the statute of limitations has not expired as of such date and
to offenses committed on or after such date.
(19) The changes made to this section by Laws 2010, LB809, shall
apply to offenses committed prior to July 15, 2010, for which the statute
of limitations has not expired as of such date and to offenses committed
on or after such date.
(20) The changes made to this section by Laws 2016, LB934, shall
apply to offenses committed prior to April 19, 2016, for which the
statute of limitations has not expired as of such date and to offenses
committed on or after such date.
-24-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
(21) The changes made to this section by Laws 2019, LB519, shall
apply to offenses committed prior to September 1, 2019, for which the
statute of limitations has not expired as of such date and to offenses
committed on or after such date.
(22) The changes made to this section by this legislative bill shall
apply to offenses committed prior to the operative date of this act for
which the statute of limitations has not expired as of such date and to
offenses committed on or after such date.
Sec. 12. Section 29-3005, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-3005 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Prostitution-related offense includes:
(i) Prostitution under section 28-801, commercial sexual
exploitation solicitation of prostitution under section 28-801.01,
keeping a place of prostitution under section 28-804, public indecency
under section 28-806, or loitering for the purpose of engaging in
prostitution or related or similar offenses under local ordinances; and
(ii) Attempt, conspiracy, solicitation, being an accessory to,
aiding and abetting, aiding the consummation of, or compounding a felony
with any of the offenses in subdivision (1)(a) of this section as the
underlying offense;
(b) Trafficker means a person who engages in sex trafficking or sex
trafficking of a minor as defined in section 28-830; and
(c) Victim of sex trafficking means a person subjected to sex
trafficking or sex trafficking of a minor, as those terms are defined in
section 28-830.
(2) At any time following the completion of sentence or disposition,
a victim of sex trafficking convicted in county or district court of, or
adjudicated in a juvenile court for, (a) a prostitution-related offense
committed while the movant was a victim of sex trafficking or proximately
caused by the movant's status as a victim of sex trafficking or (b) any
-25-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
other offense committed as a direct result of, or proximately caused by,
the movant's status as a victim of sex trafficking, may file a motion to
set aside such conviction or adjudication. The motion shall be filed in
the county, district, or separate juvenile court of the county in which
the movant was convicted or adjudicated.
(3)(a) If the court finds that the movant was a victim of sex
trafficking at the time of the prostitution-related offense or finds that
the movant's participation in the prostitution-related offense was
proximately caused by the movant's status as a victim of sex trafficking,
the court shall grant the motion to set aside a conviction or an
adjudication for such prostitution-related offense.
(b) If the court finds that the movant's participation in an offense
other than a prostitution-related offense was a direct result of or
proximately caused by the movant's status as a victim of sex trafficking,
the court shall grant the motion to set aside a conviction or an
adjudication for such offense.
(4) Official documentation of a movant's status as a victim of sex
trafficking at the time of the prostitution-related offense or other
offense shall create a rebuttable presumption that the movant was a
victim of sex trafficking at the time of the prostitution-related offense
or other offense. Such official documentation shall not be required to
obtain relief under this section. Such official documentation includes:
(a) A copy of an official record, certification, or eligibility
letter from a federal, state, tribal, or local proceeding, including an
approval notice or an enforcement certification generated from a federal
immigration proceeding, that shows that the movant is a victim of sex
trafficking; or
(b) An affidavit or sworn testimony from an attorney, a member of
the clergy, a medical professional, a trained professional staff member
of a victim services organization, or other professional from whom the
movant has sought legal counsel or other assistance in addressing the
-26-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
trauma associated with being a victim of sex trafficking.
(5) In considering whether the movant is a victim of sex
trafficking, the court may consider any other evidence the court
determines is of sufficient credibility and probative value, including an
affidavit or sworn testimony. Examples of such evidence include, but are
not limited to:
(a) Branding or other tattoos on the movant that identified him or
her as having a trafficker;
(b) Testimony or affidavits from those with firsthand knowledge of
the movant's involvement in the commercial sex trade such as solicitors
of commercial sex, family members, hotel workers, and other individuals
trafficked by the same individual or group of individuals who trafficked
the movant;
(c) Financial records showing profits from the commercial sex trade,
such as records of hotel stays, employment at indoor venues such as
massage parlors, bottle clubs, or strip clubs, or employment at an escort
service;
(d) Internet listings, print advertisements, or business cards used
to promote the movant for commercial sex; or
(e) Email, text, or voicemail records between the movant, the
trafficker, or solicitors of sex that reveal aspects of the sex trade
such as behavior patterns, meeting times, or payments or examples of the
trafficker exerting force, fraud, or coercion over the movant.
(6) Upon request of a movant, any hearing relating to the motion
shall be conducted in camera. The rules of evidence shall not apply at
any hearing relating to the motion.
(7) An order setting aside a conviction or an adjudication under
this section shall have the same effect as an order setting aside a
conviction as provided in subsections (5) and (6) of section 29-2264
except that a conviction set aside under this section shall not
constitute a conviction for which registration is required under the Sex
-27-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
Offender Registration Act.
Sec. 13. Section 29-3523, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-3523 (1) After the expiration of the periods described in
subsection (3) of this section or after the granting of a motion under
subsection (4), (5), or (6), or (7) of this section, a criminal justice
agency shall respond to a public inquiry in the same manner as if there
were no criminal history record information and criminal history record
information shall not be disseminated to any person other than a criminal
justice agency, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section or
when the subject of the record:
(a) Is currently the subject of prosecution or correctional control
as the result of a separate arrest;
(b) Is currently an announced candidate for or holder of public
office;
(c) Has made a notarized request for the release of such record to a
specific person; or
(d) Is kept unidentified, and the record is used for purposes of
surveying or summarizing individual or collective law enforcement agency
activity or practices, or the dissemination is requested consisting only
of release of criminal history record information showing (i) dates of
arrests, (ii) reasons for arrests, and (iii) the nature of the
dispositions including, but not limited to, reasons for not prosecuting
the case or cases.
(2) That part of criminal history record information described in
subsection (8) (7) of this section may be disseminated to individuals and
agencies for the express purpose of research, evaluative, or statistical
activities pursuant to an agreement with a criminal justice agency that
specifically authorizes access to the information, limits the use of the
information to research, evaluative, or statistical activities, and
ensures the confidentiality and security of the information.
-28-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
(3) Except as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section,
in the case of an arrest, citation in lieu of arrest, or referral for
prosecution without citation, all criminal history record information
relating to the case shall be removed from the public record as follows:
(a) When no charges are filed as a result of the determination of
the prosecuting attorney, the criminal history record information shall
not be part of the public record after one year from the date of arrest,
citation in lieu of arrest, or referral for prosecution without citation;
(b) When charges are not filed as a result of a completed diversion,
the criminal history record information shall not be part of the public
record after two years from the date of arrest, citation in lieu of
arrest, or referral for prosecution without citation; and
(c) When charges are filed, but the case is dismissed by the court
(i) on motion of the prosecuting attorney, (ii) as a result of a hearing
not the subject of a pending appeal, (iii) after acquittal, (iv) after a
deferred judgment, or (v) after completion of a program prescribed by a
drug court or any other problem solving court approved by the Supreme
Court, the criminal history record information shall not be part of the
public record immediately upon notification of a criminal justice agency
after acquittal pursuant to subdivision (3)(c)(iii) of this section or
after the entry of an order dismissing the case.
(4) Upon the granting of a motion to set aside a conviction or an
adjudication pursuant to section 29-3005, a person who is a victim of sex
trafficking, as defined in section 29-3005, may file a motion with the
same sentencing court for an order to seal the criminal history record
information related to such conviction or adjudication. Upon a finding
that a court issued an order setting aside such conviction or
adjudication pursuant to section 29-3005, the sentencing court shall
grant the motion and:
(a) For a conviction, issue an order as provided in subsection (8)
(7) of this section; or
-29-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
(b) For an adjudication, issue an order as provided in section
43-2,108.05.
(5) Upon the granting of a motion to set aside a conviction pursuant
to section 28-801.01, the movant may file a motion with the same court
for an order to seal the criminal history record information related to
such conviction or adjudication. Upon a finding that a court issued an
order setting aside such conviction, the court shall grant the motion and
issue an order as provided in subsection (8) of this section.
(6) (5) Any person who has received a pardon may file a motion with
the sentencing court for an order to seal the criminal history record
information and any cases related to such charges or conviction. Upon a
finding that the person received a pardon, the court shall grant the
motion and issue an order as provided in subsection (8) (7) of this
section.
(7) (6) Any person who is subject to a record which resulted in a
case being dismissed prior to January 1, 2017, as described in
subdivision (3)(c) of this section, may file a motion with the court in
which the case was filed to enter an order pursuant to subsection (8) (7)
of this section. Upon a finding that the case was dismissed for any
reason described in subdivision (3)(c) of this section, the court shall
grant the motion and enter an order as provided in subsection (8) (7) of
this section.
(8) (7) Upon acquittal or entry of an order dismissing a case
described in subdivision (3)(c) of this section, or after granting a
motion under subsection (4), (5), or (6), or (7) of this section, the
court shall:
(a) Order that all records, including any information or other data
concerning any proceedings relating to the case, including the arrest,
taking into custody, petition, complaint, indictment, information, trial,
hearing, adjudication, correctional supervision, dismissal, or other
disposition or sentence, are not part of the public record and shall not
-30-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
be disseminated to persons other than criminal justice agencies, except
as provided in subsection (1) or (2) of this section;
(b) Send notice of the order (i) to the Nebraska Commission on Law
Enforcement and Criminal Justice, (ii) to the Nebraska State Patrol, and
(iii) to law enforcement agencies, county attorneys, and city attorneys
referenced in the court record;
(c) Order all parties notified under subdivision (8)(b) (7)(b) of
this section to seal all records pertaining to the case; and
(d) If the case was transferred from one court to another, send
notice of the order to seal the record to the transferring court.
(9) (8) In any application for employment, bonding, license,
education, or other right or privilege, any appearance as a witness, or
any other public inquiry, a person cannot be questioned with respect to
any offense for which the record is sealed. If an inquiry is made in
violation of this subsection, the person may respond as if the offense
never occurred.
(10) (9) Any person arrested due to the error of a law enforcement
agency may file a petition with the district court for an order to
expunge the criminal history record information related to such error.
The petition shall be filed in the district court of the county in which
the petitioner was arrested. The county attorney shall be named as the
respondent and shall be served with a copy of the petition. The court may
grant the petition and issue an order to expunge such information if the
petitioner shows by clear and convincing evidence that the arrest was due
to error by the arresting law enforcement agency.
(11) (10) The changes made by Laws 2018, LB1132, to the relief set
forth in this section shall apply to all persons otherwise eligible in
accordance with the provisions of this section, without regard to the
date on which the person was whether arrested, cited in lieu of arrest,
referred for prosecution without citation, charged, convicted, or
adjudicated prior to, on, or subsequent to July 19, 2018.
-31-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
Sec. 14. (1) The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and
Criminal Justice shall develop a program to distribute grants to Nebraska
law enforcement agencies to help defray the additional enforcement costs
necessitated by the changes made to section 28-801.01 by this legislative
bill. Grants under this section may be used for expenses relating to the
enforcement of prostitution, commercial sexual exploitation, and sex
trafficking offense laws, including, but not limited to, hiring and
training law enforcement officers and other law enforcement agency
employees and providing and conducting educational and outreach programs
relating to such offenses.
(2) Law enforcement agencies may apply for a grant by submitting an
application in a form and manner prescribed by the commission.
(3) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this section.
(4) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate one hundred
thousand dollars from the General Fund for fiscal year 2025-26 to the
commission to carry out this section.
Sec. 15. Section 29-4001, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-4001 Sections 29-4001 to 29-4014 and section 18 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Sex Offender Registration Act.
Sec. 16. Section 29-4001.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
29-4001.01 For purposes of the Sex Offender Registration Act:
(1) Aggravated offense means any registrable offense under section
29-4003 which involves the penetration of, direct genital touching of,
oral to anal contact with, or oral to genital contact with (a) a victim
age thirteen years or older without the consent of the victim, (b) a
victim under the age of thirteen years, or (c) a victim who the sex
offender knew or should have known was mentally or physically incapable
of resisting or appraising the nature of his or her conduct;
-32-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
(2)(a) Conviction or convicted includes a plea or verdict of guilty
or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere.
(b) Conviction or convicted includes a conviction that has been set
aside under section 29-2264 or, as relates to a conviction from any other
jurisdiction, a conviction that has been set aside, expunged, or
otherwise nullified by any procedure other than by a pardon.
(c) Conviction or convicted does not include a conviction for which
a pardon has been obtained; that has been set aside under section
29-3005; or, for a conviction from another jurisdiction, that has been
set aside, expunged, or otherwise nullified by a procedure similar to
section 29-3005 that is limited to trafficking victims;
(3) (2) DNA sample has the same meaning as in section 29-4103;
(4) (3) Habitual living location means any place that an offender
may stay for a period of more than three days even though the sex
offender maintains a separate permanent address or temporary domicile;
(5) (4) Minor means a person under eighteen years of age;
(6) Other jurisdiction includes any village, town, city, state,
territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States; the
United States Government; any court-martial or other military tribunal;
or a foreign jurisdiction;
(7) (5) State DNA Database means the database established pursuant
to section 29-4104; and
(8) (6) Temporary domicile means any place at which the person
actually lives or stays for a period of at least three working days.
Sec. 17. Section 29-4003, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-4003 (1) (1)(a) The Sex Offender Registration Act applies to any
person who, on or after January 1, 1997:
(a) Is convicted (i) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere
to, or been found guilty of any of the following:
(i) (A) Kidnapping of a minor pursuant to section 28-313, except
-33-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
when the person is the parent of the minor and was not convicted of any
other offense in this section;
(ii) (B) False imprisonment of a minor pursuant to section 28-314 or
28-315;
(iii) (C) Sexual assault pursuant to section 28-319 or 28-320;
(iv) (D) Sexual abuse by a school employee pursuant to section
28-316.01;
(v) (E) Sexual assault of a child in the second or third degree
pursuant to section 28-320.01;
(vi) (F) Sexual assault of a child in the first degree pursuant to
section 28-319.01;
(vii) (G) Sexual abuse of a vulnerable adult or senior adult
pursuant to subdivision (1)(c) of section 28-386;
(viii) (H) Incest of a minor pursuant to section 28-703;
(ix) (I) Pandering of a minor pursuant to section 28-802;
(x) (J) Visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct of a child
pursuant to section 28-1463.03 or subdivision (2)(b) or (c) of section
28-1463.05;
(xi) (K) Knowingly possessing any visual depiction of sexually
explicit conduct which has a child as one of its participants or
portrayed observers pursuant to subsection (1) or (4) of section
28-813.01;
(xii) (L) Criminal child enticement pursuant to section 28-311;
(xiii) (M) Child enticement by means of an electronic communication
device pursuant to section 28-320.02;
(xiv) (N) Debauching a minor pursuant to section 28-805; or
(xv) Attempting, soliciting (O) Attempt, solicitation, aiding or
abetting, being an accessory to, or conspiring conspiracy to commit an
offense listed in subdivisions (1)(a)(i) (1)(a)(i)(A) through (xiv) (1)
(a)(i)(N) of this section;
(b) Is convicted (ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere
-34-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
to, or been found guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent
to a registrable offense under subdivision (1)(a) (1)(a)(i) of this
section by any other jurisdiction village, town, city, state, territory,
commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States, by the United
States Government, by court-martial or other military tribunal, or by a
foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a procedure comparable in effect to
that described under section 29-2264 or any other procedure to nullify a
conviction other than by pardon;
(c) (iii) Is incarcerated in a jail, a penal or correctional
facility, or any other public or private institution or is under
probation or parole as a result of pleading guilty to or being found
guilty of a conviction for a registrable offense under subdivision (1)(a)
(1)(a)(i) or (b) (ii) of this section prior to January 1, 1997; or
(d) (iv) Enters the state and is required to register as a sex
offender under the laws of any another village, town, city, state,
territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States.
(2) The (b) In addition to the registrable offenses under
subdivision (1)(a) of this section, the Sex Offender Registration Act
applies to any person who, on or after January 1, 2010:
(a) Is convicted of any of the following:
(i) Violation of section 28-311.08 requiring registration under the
act pursuant to subsection (6) of section 28-311.08;
(ii) Sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee in the first degree
pursuant to section 28-322.02;
(iii) Sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee in the second degree
pursuant to section 28-322.03;
(iv) Sexual abuse of a protected individual pursuant to section
28-322.04;
(v) Incest pursuant to section 28-703;
(vi) Child abuse pursuant to subdivision (1)(d) or (e) of section
28-707;
-35-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
(vii) Enticement by electronic communication device pursuant to
section 28-833; or
(viii) Attempting, soliciting, aiding or abetting, being an
accessory to, or conspiring to commit an offense listed in subdivisions
(2)(a)(i) through (vii) of this section;
(b)(i) Subject to (i)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(b)
(ii) (1)(b)(i)(B) of this section, is convicted has ever pled guilty to,
pled nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of any of the following:
(A) (I) Murder in the first degree pursuant to section 28-303;
(B) (II) Murder in the second degree pursuant to section 28-304;
(C) (III) Manslaughter pursuant to section 28-305;
(D) (IV) Assault in the first degree pursuant to section 28-308;
(E) (V) Assault in the second degree pursuant to section 28-309;
(F) (VI) Assault in the third degree pursuant to section 28-310;
(G) (VII) Stalking pursuant to section 28-311.03;
(VIII) Violation of section 28-311.08 requiring registration under
the act pursuant to subsection (6) of section 28-311.08;
(H) (IX) Kidnapping pursuant to section 28-313;
(I) (X) False imprisonment pursuant to section 28-314 or 28-315; or
(XI) Sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee in the first degree
pursuant to section 28-322.02;
(XII) Sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee in the second degree
pursuant to section 28-322.03;
(XIII) Sexual abuse of a protected individual pursuant to section
28-322.04;
(XIV) Incest pursuant to section 28-703;
(XV) Child abuse pursuant to subdivision (1)(d) or (e) of section
28-707;
(XVI) Enticement by electronic communication device pursuant to
section 28-833; or
(J) Attempting, soliciting (XVII) Attempt, solicitation, aiding or
-36-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
abetting, being an accessory to, or conspiring conspiracy to commit an
offense listed in subdivisions (2)(b)(i)(A) through (I) (1)(b)(i)(A)(I)
through (1)(b)(i)(A)(XVI) of this section.
(ii) (B) In order for the Sex Offender Registration Act to apply to
the offenses listed in subdivisions (2)(b)(i)(A) through (I) (1)(b)(i)(A)
(I), (II), (III), (IV), (V), (VI), (VII), (IX), and (X) of this section,
a court shall have found, by clear and convincing evidence, after
providing the defendant with notice and a hearing, that evidence of
sexual penetration or sexual contact, as those terms are defined in
section 28-318, occurred in connection with the incident that gave rise
to the conviction. When making the findings required by this subdivision,
the court shall consider any evidence adduced at the hearing as well as
any evidence was present in the record, including which shall include
consideration of the factual basis for a plea-based conviction and
information contained in the presentence report; or
(c) Is convicted (ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere
to, or been found guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent
to a registrable offense under subdivision (2)(a) or (b) (1)(b)(i) of
this section by any other jurisdiction. village, town, city, state,
territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States, by
the United States Government, by court-martial or other military
tribunal, or by a foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a procedure
comparable in effect to that described under section 29-2264 or any other
procedure to nullify a conviction other than by pardon; or
(iii) Enters the state and is required to register as a sex offender
under the laws of another village, town, city, state, territory,
commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States.
(3) The (c) In addition to the registrable offenses under
subdivisions (1)(a) and (b) of this section, the Sex Offender
Registration Act applies to any person who, on or after January 1, 2020:
(a) Is convicted of:
-37-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
(i) Sexual (i) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or
been found guilty of sexual abuse of a detainee under section 28-322.05;
or
(ii) Attempting, soliciting, aiding or abetting, being an accessory
to, or conspiring to commit an offense listed in subdivision (3)(a)(i) of
this section; or
(b) Is convicted of any offense that is substantially equivalent to
a registrable offense under subdivision (3)(a) of this section by any
other jurisdiction.
(ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent to a registrable
offense under subdivision (1)(c)(i) of this section by any village, town,
city, state, territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United
States, by the United States Government, by court-martial or other
military tribunal, or by a foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a
procedure comparable in effect to that described under section 29-2264 or
any other procedure to nullify a conviction other than by pardon.
(4) The (d) In addition to the registrable offenses under
subdivisions (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section, the Sex Offender
Registration Act applies to any person who on or after January 1, 2026
2023:
(a) Is convicted of:
(i) Sex trafficking of a minor or sex trafficking under section
28-831; or
(ii) Attempting, soliciting, aiding or abetting, being an accessory
to, or conspiring to commit an offense described in subdivision (4)(a)(i)
of this section; or
(b) Is convicted of any offense that is substantially equivalent to
a registrable offense under subdivision (4)(a) of this section by any
other jurisdiction.
(5)(a) The Sex Offender Registration Act applies to any person who,
-38-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
on or after July 14, 2006:
(i) Is convicted of:
(A) A violation of section 28-831 which is substantially equivalent
to a registrable offense described in subdivision (4)(a)(i) of this
section; or
(B) Attempting, soliciting, aiding or abetting, being an accessory
to, or conspiring to commit an offense described in subdivision (5)(a)(i)
(A) of this section; or
(ii) Is convicted of any offense that is substantially equivalent to
a registrable offense under subdivision (5)(a)(i) of this section by any
other jurisdiction.
(b) Registration under this subsection is subject to section 18 of
this act.
(6) The Sex Offender Registration Act applies to any person who, on
or after January 1, 2026:
(a) Is convicted of any of the following:
(i) Benefiting from or participating in a venture involving sex
trafficking or sex trafficking of a minor under section 7 of this act; or
(ii) Attempting, soliciting, aiding or abetting, being an accessory
to, or conspiring to commit an offense listed in subdivision (6)(a)(i) of
this section; or
(b) Is convicted of any offense that is substantially equivalent to
a registrable offense under subdivision (6)(a) of this section by any
other jurisdiction.
(7) The Sex Offender Registration Act applies to any person who, on
or after January 1, 2026, is convicted of:
(a) Commercial sexual exploitation under section 28-801.01; or
(b) Any offense that is substantially equivalent to a registrable
offense under subdivision (7)(a) of this section by any other
jurisdiction.
(i) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
-39-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
guilty of human trafficking under subsection (1) or (2) of section
28-831, and the court determines either by notification of sex offender
registration responsibilities or notation in the sentencing order that
the human trafficking was sex trafficking or sex trafficking of a minor
and not solely labor trafficking or labor trafficking of a minor; or
(ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent to a registrable
offense under subdivision (1)(d)(i) of this section by any village, town,
city, state, territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United
States, by the United States Government, by court-martial or other
military tribunal, or by a foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a
procedure comparable in effect to that described under section 29-2264 or
any other procedure to nullify a conviction other than by pardon.
(8) (2) A person appealing a conviction of a registrable offense
under this section shall be required to comply with the act during the
appeals process.
(9) The changes made to this section by this legislative bill do not
apply to any person if, prior to the operative date of this act, a court
or the sex offender registration and community notification division of
the Nebraska State Patrol determined such person was required to register
under the Sex Offender Registration Act for a conviction for a violation
of section 28-831 or a substantially equivalent offense of another
jurisdiction. Such person shall continue to be required to register in
accordance with such prior determination.
Sec. 18. (1)(a) When determining whether an offense requires
registration under subdivision (5)(a) of section 29-4003, an offense
shall not be considered substantially equivalent to sex trafficking of a
minor or sex trafficking under section 28-831 if:
(i) It is based solely upon the defendant benefiting, financially or
by receiving anything of value, from participation in a venture involving
any form of trafficking; or
-40-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
(ii) It is based solely upon labor trafficking or labor trafficking
of a minor, unless the offense included forced labor or services
involving commercial sexual activity, sexually explicit performances, or
the production of pornography.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the terms labor trafficking,
labor trafficking of a minor, forced labor or services, commercial sexual
activity, and sexually explicit performance have the same meanings as in
section 28-830.
(2) The determination of whether a person is required to register
under subdivision (5)(a) of section 29-4003 shall be made:
(a) If the conviction is for a violation of Nebraska law and the
conviction occurs on or after the operative date of this act, by the
court as provided in subsection (3) of this section; and
(b) For any other conviction, by the sex offender registration and
community notification division of the Nebraska State Patrol.
(3)(a) When determining whether a defendant is required to register
under subdivision (5)(a) of section 29-4003, the court shall only find
that a defendant is required to register if the court finds, by clear and
convincing evidence, after providing the defendant with notice and a
hearing, that the offense is registrable under subdivision (5)(a) of
section 29-4003. When making the findings required by this subdivision,
the court shall consider any evidence adduced at the hearing as well as
any evidence present in the record, including the factual basis for a
plea-based conviction and information contained in the presentence
report.
(b) A person appealing a conviction of a registrable offense under
this subsection shall be required to comply with the Sex Offender
Registration Act during the appeals process.
(4) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate twenty-five
thousand dollars from the General Fund for fiscal year 2025-26 to the
Nebraska State Patrol to implement registration of persons described in
-41-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
subsection (5) of section 29-4003 and to implement any other changes to
the Sex Offender Registration Act made by this legislative bill.
Sec. 19. Section 29-4007, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-4007 (1) When sentencing a person convicted of a registrable
offense under section 29-4003, the court shall:
(a) Provide written notification of the duty to register under the
Sex Offender Registration Act as provided in subsection (4) of this
section; at the time of sentencing to any defendant who has pled guilty
or has been found guilty of a registrable offense under section 29-4003.
The written notification shall:
(i) Inform the defendant of whether or not he or she is subject to
the act, the duration of time he or she will be subject to the act, and
that he or she shall report to a location designated by the Nebraska
State Patrol for purposes of accepting such registration within three
working days after the date of the written notification to register;
(ii) Inform the defendant that if he or she moves to another address
within the same county, he or she must report to the county sheriff of
the county in which he or she is residing within three working days
before his or her move;
(iii) Inform the defendant that if he or she no longer has a
residence, temporary domicile, or habitual living location, he or she
shall report such change in person to the sheriff of the county in which
he or she is located within three working days after such change in
residence, temporary domicile, or habitual living location;
(iv) Inform the defendant that if he or she moves to another county
in the State of Nebraska, he or she must notify, in person, the county
sheriff of the county in which he or she had been last residing, had a
temporary domicile, or had a habitual living location and the county
sheriff of the county in which he or she is residing, has a temporary
domicile, or is habitually living of his or her current address. The
-42-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
notice must be given within three working days before his or her move;
(v) Inform the defendant that if he or she moves to another state,
he or she must report, in person, the change of address to the county
sheriff of the county in which he or she has been residing, has had a
temporary domicile, or has had a habitual living location and must comply
with the registration requirements of the state to which he or she is
moving. The notice must be given within three working days before his or
her move;
(vi) Inform the defendant that he or she shall (A) inform the
sheriff of the county in which he or she resides, has a temporary
domicile, or is habitually living, in person, of each educational
institution at which he or she is employed, carries on a vocation, or
attends school, within three working days after such employment or
attendance, and (B) notify the sheriff of any change in such employment
or attendance status of such person at such educational institution,
within three working days;
(vii) Inform the defendant that he or she shall (A) inform the
sheriff of the county in which the employment site is located, in person,
of the name and address of any place where he or she is or will be an
employee, within three working days after such employment, and (B) inform
the sheriff of the county in which the employment site is located, in
person, of any change in his or her employment;
(viii) Inform the defendant that if he or she goes to another state
to work or goes to another state as a student and still resides, has a
temporary domicile, or has a habitual living location in this state, he
or she must comply with the registration requirements of both states;
(ix) Inform the defendant that fingerprints, palm prints, a DNA
sample if not previously collected, and a photograph will be obtained by
any registering entity in order to comply with the registration
requirements;
(x) Inform the defendant of registry and verification locations; and
-43-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
(xi) Inform the defendant of the reduction request requirements, if
eligible, under section 29-4005;
(b) Require the defendant to read and sign the registration form
stating that the duty of the defendant to register under the act Sex
Offender Registration Act has been explained;
(c) Retain the original notification signed by the defendant; and
(d) Provide a copy of the filed notification, the information or
amended information, and the sentencing order of the court to the county
attorney, the defendant, the sex offender registration and community
notification division of the Nebraska State Patrol, and the county
sheriff of the county in which the defendant resides, has a temporary
domicile, or has a habitual living location.
(2) When a person is convicted of a registrable offense under
section 29-4003 and is not subject to immediate incarceration upon
sentencing, prior to being released by the court, the sentencing court
shall ensure that the defendant is registered by a Nebraska State Patrol
office or other location designated by the patrol for purposes of
accepting registrations.
(3)(a) The Department of Correctional Services or a city or county
correctional or jail facility shall provide written notification of the
duty to register pursuant to the Sex Offender Registration Act as
provided in subsection (4) of this section to any person committed to its
custody for a registrable offense under section 29-4003 prior to the
person's release from incarceration.
(b) The Department of Correctional Services or a city or county
correctional or jail facility shall:
(i) Require the person to read and sign the notification form
stating that the duty to register under the act has been explained;
(ii) Retain a signed copy of the written notification to register;
and
(iii) Provide a copy of the signed, written notification to register
-44-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
to the person and to the sex offender registration and community
notification division of the Nebraska State Patrol.
(4) The written notification required by subsections (1) and (3) of
this section shall:
(a) (i) Inform the person of whether or not he or she is subject to
the act, the duration of time he or she will be subject to the act, and
that he or she shall report to a location designated by the Nebraska
State Patrol for purposes of accepting such registration within three
working days after the date of the written notification to register;
(b) (ii) Inform the person that if he or she moves to another
address within the same county, he or she must report all address
changes, in person, to the county sheriff of the county in which he or
she has been residing within three working days before his or her move;
(c) (iii) Inform the defendant that if he or she no longer has a
residence, temporary domicile, or habitual living location, he or she
shall report such change in person to the sheriff of the county in which
he or she is located within three working days after such change in
residence, temporary domicile, or habitual living location;
(d) (iv) Inform the person that if he or she moves to another county
in the State of Nebraska, he or she must notify, in person, the county
sheriff of the county in which he or she had been last residing, had a
temporary domicile, or had a habitual living location and the county
sheriff of the county in which he or she is residing, has a temporary
domicile, or is habitually living of his or her current address. The
notice must be given within three working days before his or her move;
(e) (v) Inform the person that if he or she moves to another state,
he or she must report, in person, the change of address to the county
sheriff of the county in which he or she has been residing, has had a
temporary domicile, or has been habitually living and must comply with
the registration requirements of the state to which he or she is moving.
The report must be given within three working days before his or her
-45-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
move;
(f) (vi) Inform the person that he or she shall (i) (A) inform the
sheriff of the county in which he or she resides, has a temporary
domicile, or is habitually living, in person, of each educational
institution at which he or she is employed, carries on a vocation, or
attends school, within three working days after such employment or
attendance, and (ii) (B) notify the sheriff of any change in such
employment or attendance status of such person at such educational
institution, within three working days after such change;
(g) (vii) Inform the person that he or she shall (i) (A) inform the
sheriff of the county in which the employment site is located, in person,
of the name and address of any place where he or she is or will be an
employee, within three working days after such employment, and (ii) (B)
inform the sheriff of the county in which the employment site is located,
in person, of any change in his or her employment;
(h) (viii) Inform the person that if he or she goes to another state
to work or goes to another state as a student and still resides, has a
temporary domicile, or has a habitual living location in this state, he
or she must comply with the registration requirements of both states;
(i) (ix) Inform the defendant that fingerprints, palm prints, a DNA
sample if not previously collected, and a photograph will be obtained by
any registering entity in order to comply with the registration
requirements;
(j) (x) Inform the defendant of registry and verification locations;
and
(k) (xi) Inform the defendant of the reduction request requirements,
if eligible, under section 29-4005.
(b) The Department of Correctional Services or a city or county
correctional or jail facility shall:
(i) Require the person to read and sign the notification form
stating that the duty to register under the Sex Offender Registration Act
-46-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
has been explained;
(ii) Retain a signed copy of the written notification to register;
and
(iii) Provide a copy of the signed, written notification to register
to the person and to the sex offender registration and community
notification division of the Nebraska State Patrol.
(5) (4) If a person is convicted of a registrable offense under
section 29-4003 and is immediately incarcerated, he or she shall be
registered as required under the act prior to discharge, parole, or work
release.
(6) (5) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall cause written
notification of the duty to register to be provided on the applications
for a motor vehicle operator's license and for a commercial driver's
license.
(7) (6) All written notification as provided in this section shall
be on a form approved by the Attorney General.
Sec. 20. Section 29-4802, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-4802 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a
defendant is eligible to participate in a veteran justice program if the
defendant is a veteran and can show by clear and convincing evidence that
a condition from military service contributed to the offense.
(2) A veteran is not eligible for participation in a veteran justice
program if:
(a) The veteran is charged with:
(i) An offense that is not eligible for probation;
(ii) An offense that is listed in subdivision (1)(a) (1)(a)(i) of
section 29-4003;
(iii) A violation of section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197, or a city or
village ordinance enacted in conformance with section 60-6,196 or
60-6,197, following two or more previous convictions for a violation of
-47-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
any such section or ordinance; or
(iv) An offense that resulted in the death of another person; or
(b) Deferring the entry of judgment would be prohibited under
section 60-4,147.01.
(3) Any document or materials received by the court pursuant to
sections 29-4802 to 29-4804 that contain military or medical records,
reports, or evaluations shall be privileged and shall not be disclosed
directly or indirectly to anyone other than a judge; attorneys to parties
in the case; probation officers to whom a defendant's file is duly
transferred; the probation administrator or his or her designee; alcohol
and drug counselors, mental health practitioners, psychiatrists, and
psychologists licensed or certified under the Uniform Credentialing Act
to conduct substance abuse evaluations and treatment; or others entitled
by law to receive such information, including personnel affiliated with
the veteran justice program.
(4) Upon a court determination of eligibility for participation in a
veteran justice program, the court shall provide notice to any victim or
alleged victim of the offense committed by the veteran of such
determination and the right of the veteran to request participation in a
veteran justice program.
Sec. 21. Section 76-1410, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
76-1410 Subject to additional definitions contained in the Uniform
Residential Landlord and Tenant Act and unless the context otherwise
requires:
(1) Act of domestic violence means abuse as defined in section
42-903, sexual assault under sections 28-319 to 28-320.01, domestic
assault under section 28-323, stalking under section 28-311.03, labor or
sex trafficking under section 28-831, labor trafficking under section 6
of this act, and knowing and intentional abuse, neglect, or exploitation
of a vulnerable adult or senior adult under section 28-386.
-48-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
(2) Action includes recoupment, counterclaim, setoff, suit in
equity, and any other proceeding in which rights are determined,
including an action for possession.
(3) Building and housing codes include any law, ordinance, or
governmental regulation concerning fitness for habitation, or the
construction, maintenance, operation, occupancy, use, or appearance of
any premises, or dwelling unit. Minimum housing code shall be limited to
those laws, resolutions, or ordinances or regulations, or portions
thereof, dealing specifically with health and minimum standards of
fitness for habitation.
(4) Dwelling unit means a structure or the part of a structure that
is used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one person who
maintains a household or by two or more persons who maintain a common
household.
(5) Good faith means honesty in fact in the conduct of the
transaction concerned.
(6) Household member means a child or adult, other than the
perpetrator of an act of domestic violence, who resides with a tenant.
(7) Landlord means the owner, lessor, or sublessor of the dwelling
unit or the building of which it is a part, and it also means a manager
of the premises who fails to disclose as required by section 76-1417.
(8) Organization includes a corporation, government, governmental
subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership,
limited liability company, or association, two or more persons having a
joint or common interest, and any other legal or commercial entity.
(9) Owner means one or more persons, jointly or severally, in whom
is vested (a) all or part of the legal title to property, or (b) all or
part of the beneficial ownership and a right to present use and enjoyment
of the premises; and the term includes a mortgagee in possession.
(10) Person includes an individual, limited liability company, or
organization.
-49-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
(11) Qualified third party means an organization that (a) is a
nonprofit organization organized under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code or a federally recognized Indian tribe whose governmental
body is within the borders of Nebraska and (b) has an affiliation
agreement with the Department of Health and Human Services to provide
services to victims of domestic violence and sexual assault under the
Protection from Domestic Abuse Act.
(12) Premises means a dwelling unit and the structure of which it is
a part and facilities and appurtenances therein and grounds, areas, and
facilities held out for the use of tenants generally or whose use is
promised to the tenant.
(13) Rent means all payments to be made to the landlord under the
rental agreement.
(14) Rental agreement means all agreements, written or oral, between
a landlord and tenant, and valid rules and regulations adopted under
section 76-1422 embodying the terms and conditions concerning the use and
occupancy of a dwelling unit and premises.
(15) Roomer means a person occupying a dwelling unit that lacks a
major bathroom or kitchen facility, in a structure where one or more
major facilities are used in common by occupants of the dwelling units.
Major facility in the case of a bathroom means toilet, or either a bath
or shower, and in the case of a kitchen means refrigerator, stove, or
sink.
(16) Single-family residence means a structure maintained and used
as a single dwelling unit. Notwithstanding that a dwelling unit shares
one or more walls with another dwelling unit, it is a single-family
residence if it has direct access to a street or thoroughfare and shares
neither heating facilities, hot water equipment, nor any other essential
facility or service with any other dwelling unit.
(17) Tenant means a person entitled under a rental agreement to
occupy a dwelling unit to the exclusion of others.
-50-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
Sec. 22. (1) For purposes of this section, department means the
Department of Health and Human Services.
(2)(a) The Legislature recognizes the benefits to a civil society of
a family in which children live and are raised in an environment that is
both physically and emotionally healthy.
(b) The department shall conduct education and awareness campaigns
that promote marital fidelity and harmony, preparation for home
ownership, work and life balance, the arrival of children, healthy
parenting and child-rearing, financial literacy, and anger management.
(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to annually appropriate
twenty-five thousand dollars to carry out this subsection.
(3)(a) The Legislature recognizes the inherent harm to society,
marriages, and families that is caused by the use of pornography and the
solicitation of prostitution.
(b) The department shall conduct an educational campaign
highlighting the damages caused to healthy relationships by pornography,
the inherent dangers of prostitution, and the logical negative outcomes
from sexual activities outside of a committed relationship.
(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to annually appropriate
twenty-five thousand dollars to carry out this subsection.
Sec. 23. Section 84-941.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-941.01 Potentially disqualifying conviction includes a conviction
for:
(1) Criminal attempt as provided in section 28-201, conspiracy as
provided in section 28-202, or aiding and abetting as provided in section
28-206, to commit an offense listed in this section;
(2) Murder as provided in sections 28-303 or 28-304;
(3) Manslaughter as provided in section 28-305;
(4) Motor vehicle homicide as provided in section 28-306;
(5) Assault in the first or second degree as provided in sections
-51-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
28-308 and 28-309;
(6) Terroristic threats as provided in section 28-311.01;
(7) Stalking as provided in section 28-311.03;
(8) Kidnapping as provided in section 28-313;
(9) False imprisonment as provided in sections 28-314 and 28-315;
(10) A sexual act subject to criminal penalties as provided in
sections 28-317 to 28-322.05;
(11) Domestic assault as provided in section 28-323;
(12) Robbery as provided in section 28-324;
(13) Arson as provided in sections 28-502, 28-503, and 28-504;
(14) Fraud subject to criminal penalties as provided in sections
28-505, 28-631, 28-638, 28-639, 28-640, and 28-935;
(15) Theft as provided in sections 28-511, 28-512, 28-513, and
28-515;
(16) Forgery as provided in sections 28-602 and 28-603;
(17) Incest as provided in section 28-703;
(18) Child abuse as provided in section 28-707;
(19) Any trafficking offense Human trafficking, labor trafficking,
sex trafficking, labor trafficking of a minor, or sex trafficking of a
minor as provided in section 28-831 or section 6, 7, or 8 of this act;
(20) False reporting as provided in section 28-907;
(21) Perjury as provided in section 28-915;
(22) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, certain
employees, or a health care professional in the first degree as provided
in section 28-929;
(23) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, certain
employees, or a health care professional in the second degree as provided
in section 28-930;
(24) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, certain
employees, or a health care professional in the third degree as provided
in section 28-931;
-52-

LB511 LB511
2025 2025
(25) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, certain
employees, or a health care professional using a motor vehicle as
provided in section 28-931.01;
(26) An offense that has as an element the threat to inflict serious
bodily injury as defined in section 28-109 or death on another person,
the intentional infliction of serious bodily injury as defined in section
28-109 on another person, or intentionally causing the death of another
person;
(27) An offense for which registration is required under the Sex
Offender Registration Act; or
(28) Any offense under the laws of another jurisdiction that is
substantially equivalent to any of the offenses listed in this section.
Sec. 24. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 25. Original sections 25-21,302, 28-801.01, 29-4001,
29-4001.01, and 84-941.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and
sections 28-101, 28-830, 28-831, 28-1354, 29-110, 29-3005, 29-3523,
29-4003, 29-4007, 29-4802, and 76-1410, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-53-